Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.340

Board—Records.

All records of the board shall be kept in the office of the director. Copies of all records and papers of the board, certified to be true copies by the director, shall be received in evidence in all cases with like effect as the originals. All actions by the board which require publication, or any writing shall be over the signature of the director or his or her designee.

[ 2011 c 336 s 526; 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 25.]